Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-27] Preliminary or interlocutory
injunctions and temporary restraining orders. Notwithstanding any other
law to the contrary, no preliminary or interlocutory injunction, or temporary
restraining order, suspending, enjoining, or restraining the enforcement,
operation, or execution of, or setting aside, in whole or in part, on the
ground of unconstitutionality or for any other reason or reasons, any provision
of this chapter or any proclamation, order, or rule prescribed, made, or issued
under the authority of this chapter, shall be issued or granted by any court of
the State, or by any judge thereof, unless the application for the same is
presented to a circuit judge, is heard and determined by the circuit judge
sitting with two other circuit judges, and a majority of the judges concur in
granting the application. When the application is presented to a judge, the
judge shall immediately notify the chief justice of the supreme court of the
State, or the senior associate justice in the event of the chief justice's
absence or incapacity or a vacancy in the office, who shall forthwith assign
two other circuit judges to sit with the circuit judge in hearing and
determining the application.

The application shall not be heard or
determined before at least five days' notice of the hearing has been given to
the governor and the attorney general, or to the mayor and the county
corporation counsel, as applicable, and to such other persons as may be
defendants or respondents in the suits. In cases in which immediate
irreparable damage would otherwise ensue to the petitioner, the circuit judge
to whom the application is made may, after giving notice to the governor and
the attorney general, or the mayor and the county corporation counsel, as
applicable, and allowing them an opportunity to appear, grant a temporary stay
or suspension, in whole or in part, of the operation of the statutory
provision, proclamation, order, or rule. The temporary stay or suspension
shall remain in force only until the hearing and determination of the
application for a preliminary or interlocutory injunction, and in any event for
not more than ten days from the date of the order of the judge. If the two
additional circuit judges have been assigned to the case, no temporary stay or
suspension shall be ordered unless a majority of the three circuit judges shall
concur.

In a case of the stay or suspension, the order
of the judge or judges shall contain a finding or findings, based upon evidence
submitted to the judge or judges and incorporated in the order by reference
thereto, that irreparable damage would result to the petitioner, and specifying
the nature of the damage and why it is immediate and irreparable. The three
circuit judges assigned to sit in the case may, upon a like finding and for
good cause shown, appearing from reasons entered of record, continue the
temporary stay or suspension for an additional ten-day period, but for only one
such period unless the party against whom the order is directed consents that
it may be extended for a longer period. The hearing upon an application for a
preliminary or interlocutory injunction shall be given precedence and shall be
in every way expedited and be assigned for hearing at the earliest practicable
day.

If a temporary stay or suspension has been
allowed, the application for a preliminary or interlocutory injunction shall be
set for hearing within five days after the granting of the stay or suspension. When
the matter comes on for hearing, the party who obtained the temporary stay or
suspension shall proceed with the application for a preliminary or
interlocutory injunction. Otherwise the temporary order shall be dissolved
forthwith. No extension of time shall be granted without the approval of at
least two of the three judges. Upon the final hearing of any such suit, the
same requirement as to judges and the same procedure as to expedition shall
apply. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Revision Note

Subsection (a) designation deleted pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next